dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: jeure
SFX 61 Y 90
SFX 61 eure aure/_v_D_Y re
SFX 61 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 61 eure aient/_C re
SFX 61 eure aent/_C re
SFX 61 eure agut/_v_Y re
SFX 61 eure aguda/_Y re
SFX 61 eure aguts/_Y re
SFX 61 eure agudes/_Y re
SFX 61 eure ac/_Z re
SFX 61 ure c/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aus/_Z re
SFX 61 re s/_Z re
SFX 61 eure au/_Z re
SFX 61 re 0/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aiem/_Z re
SFX 61 ure im/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aieu/_Z re
SFX 61 ure is/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aeu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auen/_Z re
SFX 61 re en/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ies/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 61 eure èiem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure éiem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure èieu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure éieu/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ien/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguí/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agué/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auré/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auràs/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurà/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aureu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auran/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auria/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auries/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auria/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auríem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auríeu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurien/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aga/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agui/_Z re
SFX 61 ure gui/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agues/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguis/_Z re
SFX 61 ure guis/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aga/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agui/_Z re
SFX 61 ure gui/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguen/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguin/_Z re
SFX 61 ure guin/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agués/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessis/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguesses/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agués/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssim/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssiu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguésseu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessin/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessen/_Z re
SFX 61 eure au/_C re
SFX 61 re 0/_C re
SFX 61 eure aga/_D re
SFX 61 eure agui/_D re
SFX 61 ure gui/_D re
SFX 61 eure aguem/_C re
SFX 61 eure aieu/_C re
SFX 61 ure is/_C re
SFX 61 eure aeu/_C re
SFX 61 eure aguen/_C re
SFX 61 eure aguin/_C re
SFX 61 ure guin/_C re

# Model de conjugació: júnyer
SFX 62 Y 70
SFX 62 r r/_v_C_Y er
SFX 62 únyer unyent/_C er
SFX 62 únyer unyut/_v_Y er
SFX 62 únyer unyuda/_Y er
SFX 62 únyer unyuts/_Y er
SFX 62 únyer unyudes/_Y er
SFX 62 únyer unyo/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer uny/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unys/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer uny/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyen/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyia/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyies/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyia/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyíem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyíeu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyien/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyí/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeres/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyé/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyérem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyéreu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeren/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeré/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeràs/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyerà/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyerem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyereu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeran/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeria/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeries/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeria/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeríem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeríeu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyerien/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unya/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyi/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyes/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyis/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unya/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyi/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyen/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyin/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyés/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyera/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyessis/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeres/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyesses/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyés/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyera/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyéssim/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyérem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyéssem/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyéssiu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyéreu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyésseu/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyessin/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyeren/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer unyessen/_Z er
SFX 62 únyer uny/_C er
SFX 62 únyer unya/_D er
SFX 62 únyer unyi/_D er
SFX 62 únyer unyem/_C er
SFX 62 únyer unyeu/_C er
SFX 62 únyer unyen/_C er
SFX 62 únyer unyin/_C er

# Model de conjugació: lleure
SFX 63 Y 21
SFX 63 e e/_v_D_Y re
SFX 63 ure gut/_v_Y re
SFX 63 re 0/_Z re
SFX 63 re en/_Z re
SFX 63 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 63 ure ien/_Z re
SFX 63 ure gué/_Z re
SFX 63 ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 63 e à/_Z re
SFX 63 e an/_Z re
SFX 63 e ia/_Z re
SFX 63 e ien/_Z re
SFX 63 ure ga/_Z re
SFX 63 ure gui/_Z re
SFX 63 ure guen/_Z re
SFX 63 ure guin/_Z re
SFX 63 ure gués/_Z re
SFX 63 ure guera/_Z re
SFX 63 ure guessin/_Z re
SFX 63 ure gueren/_Z re
SFX 63 ure guessen/_Z re

# Model de conjugació: lloar
SFX 64 Y 84
SFX 64 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 64 r nt/_C ar
SFX 64 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 64 r da/_Y ar
SFX 64 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 64 r des/_Y ar
SFX 64 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar u/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 64 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 64 r m/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 64 r u/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 64 r va/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 64 r va/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 64 r res/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 64 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 64 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 64 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 64 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar ïs/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar ï/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar ïn/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 64 r res/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 64 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 64 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 64 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 64 r 0/_D ar
SFX 64 ar e/_D ar
SFX 64 ar ï/_D ar
SFX 64 ar em/_C ar
SFX 64 r u/_C ar
SFX 64 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 64 ar en/_C ar
SFX 64 ar ïn/_C ar
