dictionaries/ca-valencia/index.dic
abarloar/64
accentuar/64
acorruar/64
actuar/64
afuar/64
ajeure/61
aperduar/64
arruar/64
aspectuar/64
atenuar/64
avaluar/64
conceptuar/64
consensuar/64
continuar/64
cornuar/64
desaccentuar/64
descoar/64
desconceptuar/64
descruar/64
descuar/64
deshabituar/64
desinfatuar/64
deslloar/64
desnuar/64
dessuar/64
desvirtuar/64
devaluar/64
discontinuar/64
efectuar/64
emproar/64
encruar/64
entresuar/64
enviduar/64
escoar/64
escuar/64
espuar/64
evacuar/64
exceptuar/64
expuntuar/64
extenuar/64
fluctuar/64
graduar/64
gruar/64
habituar/64
incoar/64
individuar/64
infatuar/64
insinuar/64
interactuar/64
jeure/61
júnyer/62
lleure/63
lloar/64
menstruar/64
nuar/64
perpetuar/64
poar/64
preceptuar/64
promiscuar/64
puntuar/64
reavaluar/64
recruar/64
redituar/64
regruar/64
resituar/64
ressituar/64
revaluar/64
situar/64
sobreactuar/64
suar/64
tatuar/64
traspuar/64
usufructuar/64
